Illinois, session 104th, HB3519.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5adding Section 20-17 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/20-17 new)7    Sec. 20-17. Continuous improvement procurements.8    (a) To promote broader inclusion of small and diverse 9firms, a State agency or public institution of higher 10education may request that certain procurements be designated 11as continuous improvement procurements. 12    (b) Once a procurement is designated as a continuous 13improvement procurement, the State agency or public 14institution of higher education may resolicit the defined 15services no sooner than every 6 months but shall, at minimum, 16resolicit the defined services at least annually during the 17term of the award. 18    (c) Awarded respondents awarded during the initial 19solicitation shall be awarded through the term of the award 20unless self-electing to be removed from the award. 21    (d) A State agency or public institution of higher 22education shall use the same evaluation criteria established 23at the initial publication for all subsequent resolicitations.